Tennessee statutes. Title 12 Public Property, Printing And Contracts
Part 1

General Provisions

12-7-101. Control of cost and proliferation of publications and reports — Permanent record of publications.

In order to control the cost and proliferation of publications and reports printed by state agencies, the commissioner of general services shall provide a permanent record of publications issued by state government and shall have authority to issue regulations implementing provisions concerning designation in such a manner as to provide for maximum continuity of the publications.

Acts 1976, ch. 694, § 1; 1979, ch. 296, § 1; T.C.A., § 12-1001; Acts 1990, ch. 1024, § 1; 2008, ch. 1120, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. The state agencies publication committee, created by this section, was terminated by Acts 2008, ch. 1120, § 2, effective June 13, 2008.

12-7-102. Duties of commissioner of general services.

It is the duty of the commissioner of general services to establish rules and regulations to control the costs and quantity of all publications, and to promulgate rules and regulations governing the printing and distribution of state agency reports and publications issued by agencies and departments of the government of this state, excluding institutions of higher education, the judicial branch of state government and those state institutions and facilities exempted from public purchase laws in § 12-3-103. For purposes of this part, rules of the publications committee in existence on May 1, 2008, shall be deemed rules of the commissioner of general services.

The rules and regulations on distribution shall include a provision stipulating that there shall be no automatic distribution of reports or publications, except the distribution provided for in chapter 6 of this title, or otherwise by law or resolution enacted after May 25, 1984, but that all distributions must either be approved in general by the commissioner of general services or be made upon request by the recipient.

It also is the duty of the commissioner of general services to establish a procedure for reviewing all publications as defined in subsection (e), and to approve or disapprove the printing of existing publications and planned publications that come under this part.

The commissioner of general services shall determine the need for existing and planned publications based upon the agency's goals and purpose or statutory requirements, and the quantity and distribution of each approved publication.

“Publications” includes any newsletter, stationery, greeting card, report or printed material produced for distribution outside the department or agency for which the report or printed material is printed, including those printed at facilities not operated by the state.

The commissioner of general services may appoint a designee to fulfill the responsibilities laid out in this section.

Acts 1976, ch. 694, § 2; T.C.A., § 12-1002; Acts 1980, ch. 742, §§ 1, 2; 1982, ch. 563, § 4; 1984, ch. 798, § 5; 1990, ch. 1024, §§ 2, 3; 2008, ch. 1120, § 2.

12-7-103. Approval required.

No publication, coming within the jurisdiction of the commissioner of general services as provided by § 12-7-102, shall be printed unless it has been approved in accordance with rules promulgated by the commissioner of general services. Rules set forth by the commissioner of general services shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

The commissioner of general services shall require any publication printed to include the number of copies printed.

The commissioner of general services shall not approve any publication that purports to contain a citation to or a reproduction of a duly promulgated agency rule, as defined by the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, in § 4-5-102, prior to receiving a written statement from the secretary of state or the secretary of state's representative verifying the fact that the rule so cited or reproduced has been duly promulgated and is currently in effect.

A printing authorization number shall be assigned to each publication that has been approved as required by this section. The printing authorization number shall be affixed to the publication adjacent to the identification of the agency responsible for the publication. No printing facility operated by the state shall print any publication, coming within the jurisdiction of the commissioner of general services as provided by § 12-7-102, unless the printing authorization number has been affixed as required by this subsection (d). No contract shall be entered into, nor requisition issued, nor acted upon, by any state department or agency, including, but not limited to, the division of purchasing, for printing of any publication coming within the jurisdiction of the commissioner of general services as provided by § 12-7-102, at any facility, unless the printing authorization number has been affixed as required by this subsection (d). All state contracts or grant agreements, including, but not limited to, all contracts for personal, professional and consultant services entered into under former §§ 12-4-109 and 12-4-110 [repealed], that involve or may involve the printing of any publication, coming within the jurisdiction of the commissioner of general services as provided by § 12-7-102, shall contain a provision whereby the contractor or grantee agrees that no publication shall be printed unless a printing authorization number has been obtained and affixed as required by this section.

Whenever any department, institution or agency of the state government contracts for the printing of a publication coming within the jurisdiction of the commissioner of general services as provided by § 12-7-102, and the publication has not been approved in accordance with rules promulgated by the commissioner of general services, the contract shall be void and of no effect.

Acts 1976, ch. 694, § 3; T.C.A., § 12-1003; Acts 1980, ch. 455, § 1; 1982, ch. 563, §§ 5, 6; 1983, ch. 80, §§ 1, 2; 2008, ch. 1120, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former §§12-4-109 and12-4-110, referred to in this section, were recodified by Acts 2013, ch, 403, effective July 1, 2013. Provisions similar to former §12-4-109 were transferred to other sections within title 12, ch. 3, parts 1 and 3. Provisions similar to former §12-4-110 were transferred to §12-3-303.

12-7-104. Publications information required.

The commissioner of general services shall, as a minimum, keep the following information on each approved publication:

Name of publication;

Department producing publication;

Purpose and brief description of publication contents;

Number of copies authorized to be printed;

A general list of distribution; and

Estimated cost of preparation and printing.

Acts 1976, ch. 694, § 4; T.C.A., § 12-1004; Acts 1990, ch. 1024, § 4; 2008, ch. 1120, § 2.

12-7-105. Requested material to be provided — Cooperation required.

It is the duty of all departments, institutions or agencies of state government to furnish to the commissioner of general services all material requested from the commissioner regarding publications and reports.

Acts 1976, ch. 694, § 5; T.C.A., § 12-1005; Acts 2008, ch. 1120, § 2.

12-7-106. [Repealed.]

Acts 1976, ch. 694, § 6; T.C.A., § 12-1006; Acts 1980, ch. 455, § 2; 1982, ch. 563, §§ 7-9; 1984, ch. 798, § 6; 1998, ch. 581, § 2; 2002, ch. 758, § 3, repealed by Acts 2015. ch. 87, § 2, effective April 9, 2015.

Compiler's Notes. Former §12-7-106 concerned higher education and technical institutions publication committee; establishment; duties.

Acts 2015, ch. 87, § 5 provided that, notwithstanding §4-29-112, the higher education and technical institutions publication committee, created by §12-7-106, shall terminate and shall cease to exist upon April 9, 2015.

12-7-107. Approval procedure.

The approval procedure for publications established under this part may allow one-time approval of a publication that is printed on a periodic basis and that conforms to the format, design, and purpose of the publication as originally presented to the commissioner of general services for approval without requiring review and approval of subsequent issues of the publication.

Acts 1976, ch. 694, § 7; T.C.A., § 12-1007; Acts 2008, ch. 1120, § 2; 2015, ch. 87, § 3.

12-7-108. Exceptions to Part.

The requirements of this part do not apply to any student newspaper publication or annuals and/or yearbooks.

Acts 1976, ch. 694, § 8; T.C.A., § 12-1008.